Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.22
Commercial hazardous waste management facility permit; expiration; renewal.

Permits shall expire five years following the date of issuance but may be renewed if the permittee has complied with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder.

Laws 1980, LB 853, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-1521.05;

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 16;

Laws 1987, LB 152, § 9.